Washington statutes.
RCW 41.26.725

Board of trustees—Contributions—Minimum and increased benefits.

(1) The board of trustees shall establish contributions as set forth in this section. The cost of the minimum benefits as defined in this plan shall be funded on the following ratio:

Employee contributions

50%

Employer contributions

30%

State contributions

20%

(2) The minimum benefits shall constitute a contractual obligation of the state and the contributing employers and may not be reduced below the levels in effect on July 1, 2003. The state and the contributing employers shall maintain the minimum benefits on a sound actuarial basis in accordance with the actuarial standards adopted by the board.

(3) Increased benefits created as provided for in RCW 41.26.720 are granted on a basis not to exceed the contributions provided for in this section. In addition to the contributions necessary to maintain the minimum benefits, for any increased benefits provided for by the board, the employee contribution shall not exceed fifty percent of the actuarial cost of the benefit. In no instance shall the employee cost exceed ten percent of covered payroll without the consent of a majority of the affected employees. Employer contributions shall not exceed thirty percent of the cost, but in no instance shall the employer contribution exceed six percent of covered payroll. State contributions shall not exceed twenty percent of the cost, but in no instance shall the state contribution exceed four percent of covered payroll. Employer contributions may not be increased above the maximum under this section without the consent of the governing body of the employer. State contributions may not be increased above the maximum provided for in this section without the consent of the legislature. In the event that the cost of maintaining the increased benefits on a sound actuarial basis exceeds the aggregate contributions provided for in this section, the board shall submit to the affected members of the plan the option of paying the increased costs or of having the increased benefits reduced to a level sufficient to be maintained by the aggregate contributions. The reduction of benefits in accordance with this section shall not be deemed a violation of the contractual rights of the members, provided that no reduction may result in benefits being lower than the level of the minimum benefits.

(4) The board shall manage the trust in a manner that maintains reasonable contributions and administrative costs. Providing additional benefits to members and beneficiaries is the board's priority.

[ 2003 c 93 s 1; 2003 c 2 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 790, approved November 5, 2002).]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 93: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 23, 2003]." [ 2003 c 93 s 2.]